Colorado, session 2025B, HB25B-1020.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) The state of Colorado is currently facing a budgetary structural
deficit that the office of state planning and budgeting has projected will
be $783 million for state fiscal year 2025-26;
(b) The structural deficit does not allow the general assembly to
disregard the state constitution or violate the rights of Colorado taxpayers;
(c) Section 20 (4)(a) of article X of the state constitution requires
the state to obtain voter approval in advance of a tax policy change
directly causing a net tax revenue gain to any district;
(d) Accordingly, the general assembly shall not enact a bill that
would require an addition to a taxpayer's federal taxable income for
purposes of determining the taxpayer's state taxable income without
obtaining voter approval in advance for such an addition; and
(e) Doing otherwise would violate section 20 (4)(a) of article X
of the state constitution.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-22-104, repeal as
-2- HB25B-1020

it will become effective January 1, 2026, (3)(u); and add (6) as follows:
39-22-104. Income tax imposed on individuals, estates, and
trusts - single rate - report - tax preference performance statement
- legislative declaration - definitions - repeal. (3) There shall be added
to the federal taxable income:
(u) The amount of any overtime compensation excluded or
deducted from federal gross income.
(6) (a) THE ADDITION TO FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME OF AN
AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE DEDUCTION ALLOWED UNDER SECTION 199A OF
THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE FOR A TAXPAYER WHO FILES A SINGLE
RETURN AND WHOSE ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME IS GREATER THAN FIVE
HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS, AND FOR TAXPAYERS WHO FILE A JOINT
RETURN AND WHOSE ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME IS GREATER THAN ONE
MILLION DOLLARS, QUALIFIES AS "A TAX POLICY CHANGE DIRECTLY
CAUSING A NET TAX REVENUE GAIN TO ANY DISTRICT" AND EITHER
EXTENDING OR ENACTING THIS ADDITION REQUIRES VOTER APPROVAL IN
ADVANCE PURSUANT TO SECTION 20 (4)(a) OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION.
(b) THE ADDITION TO FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME OF THE AMOUNT
OF ANY OVERTIME COMPENSATION EXCLUDED OR DEDUCTED FROM
FEDERAL GROSS INCOME QUALIFIES AS "A TAX POLICY CHANGE DIRECTLY
CAUSING A NET TAX REVENUE GAIN TO ANY DISTRICT" AND REQUIRES
VOTER APPROVAL IN ADVANCE PURSUANT TO SECTION 20 (4)(a) OF
ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION.
SECTION 3. In Session Laws of Colorado 2025, repeal section
18 of chapter 202.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
-3- HB25B-1020

determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-4- HB25B-1020